Vermont, session 2025-2026, S263.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 1605 is amended to read:
§ 1605. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
* * *
VT LEG #385982 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.263
2026 Page 2 of 11
(3) “Automated traffic law enforcement system” or “ATLE system”
means a device with one or more sensors that is:
(A) working in conjunction with a speed measuring device to
produce recorded images of the rear registration number plates of motor
vehicles traveling at more than 10 miles above the speed limit;
(B) working in conjunction with a traffic signal to produce recorded
images of the rear registration plates of motor vehicles entering an intersection
in a manner that is prohibited pursuant to subdivision 1022(a)(3) of this title;
and
(C) working in conjunction with a sound measuring device to
produce recorded images of the rear registration plates of motor vehicles
operating at a sound level that exceeds the maximum sound level permitted by
a municipal ordinance.
* * *
(9) “Recorded image” means a photograph, microphotograph, electronic
image, or electronic video that shows, clearly enough to identify, the rear
registration number plate of a motor vehicle that has activated the radar or
other detection component of an ATLE system by traveling past the ATLE
system at more than 10 miles above the speed limit; entering an intersection in
a manner that is prohibited pursuant to subdivision 1022(a)(3) of this title; or
VT LEG #385982 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.263
2026 Page 3 of 11
operating at a sound level that exceeds the maximum sound level permitted by
a municipal ordinance.
* * *
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 1606 is amended to read:
§ 1606. AUTOMATED TRAFFIC LAW ENFORCEMENT SYSTEMS;
SPEEDING
(a) Use. Deployment of ATLE systems on behalf of the Agency of
Transportation by a third party pursuant to subsection (b) of this section or by a
municipal law enforcement agency as provided pursuant to subsection (b) of
this section is intended to investigate the benefits of automated law
enforcement for speeding, red light, and vehicle noise violations as a way to
improve work crew safety and reduce traffic crashes resulting from an
increased adherence to traffic laws achieved by effective deterrence of
potential violators, which could not be achieved by traditional law enforcement
methods or traffic calming measures, or both. Deployment of ATLE systems
on behalf of the Agency and municipal law enforcement agencies is not
intended to replace law enforcement personnel, nor is it intended to mitigate
problems caused by deficient road design, construction, or maintenance.
(b) Vendor.
* * *
VT LEG #385982 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.263
2026 Page 4 of 11
(2) A municipal law enforcement agency that is authorized to utilize
ATLE pursuant to section 1610 of this subchapter may purchase or lease
ATLE systems for use pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter or may
contract with a third party for the operation and deployment of ATLE systems
on behalf of the municipal law enforcement agency.
(3) The Agency or a municipal law enforcement agency, in consultation
with the Department of Public Safety, may require the vendor to maintain a
storage system to store any recorded images or other data collected by the
ATLE system. Any storage system shall adhere to the use, retention, and
limitation requirements pursuant to this section.
(c) Locations. An ATLE system may only be utilized:
(1) at a location in the vicinity of a work zone that is located on either a
limited-access highway under the jurisdiction of the Agency of Transportation
and that is selected by the Agency or on a highway within the jurisdiction of a
municipal law enforcement agency that is selected by the law enforcement
agency, provided that:
(1)(A)(i) for a location selected by the Agency of Transportation, the
Agency shall document through an appropriate engineering analysis that the
location meets highway standards; or
VT LEG #385982 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.263
2026 Page 5 of 11
(ii) for a location selected by a municipal law enforcement agency,
the municipal law enforcement agency shall confirm through an appropriate
engineering analysis that the location meets highway standards;
(2)(B) the ATLE system is not used as a means of combating
deficiencies in roadway design or environment;
(3)(C) at least two signs notifying members of the traveling public of the
use of an ATLE system are in place before any recorded images or other data
is collected by the ATLE system;
(4)(D) there is a sign at the end of the work zone;
(5)(E) the ATLE system is only in operation when workers are present
in the work zone and at least one of the signs required under subdivision (3) of
this subsection indicates whether the ATLE system is currently in operation;
and
(6)(F) there is notice of the use of the ATLE system on the Agency’s
website or, for a municipal work zone, on the municipality’s website, including
the location and typical hours when workers are present and the ATLE system
is in operation;
(2) at locations with a high incidence of crashes, speeding, or red light
violations, or any combination of the three, if the municipal law enforcement
agency with jurisdiction over the location determines, in its sole discretion, that
it may be impractical or unsafe to utilize traditional law enforcement methods
VT LEG #385982 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.263
2026 Page 6 of 11
or that the use of traditional law enforcement personnel has failed to deter
violators, provided that:
(A) the municipal law enforcement agency confirms, through a traffic
engineering analysis of the proposed location, that the location meets highway
safety standards;
(B) the ATLE system is not used as a means of combating
deficiencies in roadway design or environment;
(C) at least two signs notifying members of the traveling public of the
use of an ATLE system are in place before any recorded images or other data
is collected by the ATLE system; and
(D) there is notice of the use of the ATLE system, including its
location, on the municipality’s website; and
(3) at locations with a high incidence of vehicle noise violations, if the
municipal law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the location
determines, in its sole discretion, that it may be impractical or unsafe to utilize
traditional law enforcement methods or that the use of traditional law
enforcement personnel has failed to deter violators, provided that:
(A) at least two signs notifying members of the traveling public of
the use of an ATLE system are in place before any recorded images or other
data is collected by the ATLE system; and
VT LEG #385982 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.263
2026 Page 7 of 11
(B) there is notice of the use of the ATLE system, including its
location, on the municipality’s website.
(d) Daily log.
* * *
(2) The daily log shall be retained for not fewer than three years by the
Agency or the municipal law enforcement agency, as appropriate, and be
admissible in any proceeding for a violation involving ATLE systems
deployed on behalf of the Agency or the municipal law enforcement agency.
(e) Annual calibration. All ATLE systems shall undergo an annual
calibration check performed by an independent calibration laboratory. The
calibration laboratory shall issue a signed certificate of calibration after the
annual calibration check, which shall be retained for not fewer than three years
by the Agency or the municipal law enforcement agency, as appropriate, and
be admissible in any proceeding for a violation involving the ATLE system.
(f) Penalty.
(1) The owner of the motor vehicle bearing the rear registration number
plate captured in a recorded image shall be liable for one of the following civil
penalties unless, for the violation in question, the owner is convicted of
exceeding the speed limit under chapter 13 of this title, violating the provisions
of subdivision 1022(a)(3) of this title, operating the vehicle at a sound level
VT LEG #385982 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.263
2026 Page 8 of 11
that exceeds the maximum sound level permitted by a municipal ordinance, or
has a defense under subsection (h) of this section:
* * *
(h) Defenses. The following shall be defenses to a violation under this
section:
* * *
(2) that the radar or other detection component of the ATLE system was
not properly calibrated or tested at the time of the violation.
* * *
(k) Review process and annual report.
(1) The Agency of Transportation, in consultation with the Department
of Public Safety, shall establish a review process to ensure that recorded
images are used only for the purposes permitted by this section. The Agency
of Transportation shall report the results of this review annually on or before
January 15 to the Senate and House Committees on Judiciary and on
Transportation. The report shall contain the following information based on
prior calendar year data:
(A) the total number of ATLE systems units being operated in the
State on behalf of the Agency in the State and on behalf of municipal law
enforcement agencies;
VT LEG #385982 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.263
2026 Page 9 of 11
(B) the terms of any contracts entered into with any vendors for the
deployment of ATLE on behalf of the Agency or on behalf of municipal law
enforcement agencies;
(C) all of the locations where an ATLE system was deployed along
with the dates and hours that the ATLE system was in operation;
(D) the number of violations issued based on recorded images and
the outcomes of those violations by category, including first, second, and third
and subsequent violations and contested violations;
(E) the number of recorded images the Agency and municipal law
enforcement agencies submitted to the automated traffic law enforcement
storage system;
(F) the total amount paid in civil penalties; and
(G) any recommended changes for the use of ATLE systems in
Vermont.
* * *
Sec. 3. 23 V.S.A. § 1610 is added to read:
§ 1610. AUTHORIZATION OF MUNICIPAL ATLE USE
(a) A municipal law enforcement agency shall not utilize ATLE within the
municipality until affirmatively permitted to do so pursuant to subsection (b) of
this section.
VT LEG #385982 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.263
2026 Page 10 of 11
(b)(1) A municipal law enforcement agency may submit a proposal to
utilize ATLE within the municipality to the legislative body of the
municipality. The proposal shall include information regarding:
(A) the types of ATLE the law enforcement agency proposes to use;
(B) the traffic offenses the ATLE is intended to address; and
(C) whether the law enforcement agency proposes to purchase or
lease the ATLE systems or to contract with a third party for the operation and
deployment of ATLE system.
(2) Following review of the proposal, the legislative body of the
municipality shall determine whether to submit to the voters of the
municipality the question of whether to utilize ATLE within the municipality
in accordance with the proposal.
(3) Upon a vote of approval by a majority of the voters present and
voting at an annual or special meeting duly warned for that purpose, the
municipal law enforcement agency may utilize ATLE within the municipality
in accordance with the proposal.
(c) A municipality may rescind the vote to approve ATLE use by a
majority vote of those present and voting at an annual or special meeting
warned for that purpose. A proposal to rescind the vote to approve ATLE use
may be brought by petition of five percent of the voters of the municipality.
VT LEG #385982 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.263
2026 Page 11 of 11
Sec. 4. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 135, Sec. 5 is amended to read:
Sec. 5. PROSPECTIVE REPEAL
4 V.S.A. § 1102(b)(33) (Vermont Judicial Bureau jurisdiction over
automated traffic law enforcement violations) and 23 V.S.A. §§ 1606–1608
(automated law enforcement) are repealed on July 1, 2027; provided, however,
if the Agency is unable to secure federal funding for a work zone ATLE pilot
program by June 30, 2025, then 4 V.S.A. § 1102(b)(33) and 23 V.S.A.
§§ 1606–1608 are repealed on July 2, 2025 2029.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385982 v.3